District of Columbia statutes.
47-398.03

No appropriation necessary for arena preconstruction activities.

The fourth sentence of section 446 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act (§ 1-204.46) shall not apply with respect to any of the following obligations or expenditures:

(1)

Borrowing conducted pursuant to § 47-398.01(a);

(2)

The pledging of revenues as security for such borrowing pursuant to § 47-398.02(a);

(3)

The payment of principal, interest, premium, debt servicing, contributions to reserves, or other costs associated with such borrowing; or

(4)

Other obligations or expenditures made to carry out any arena preconstruction activity described in § 47-398.04.

Sept. 6, 1995, 109 Stat. 269, Pub. L. 104-28, § 203
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-398.3.